Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 6 General Provisions
12-7-106. Acts 1977, No. 558, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1306.

Acts 1991, No. 343, § 1, provided:

“The Arkansas Crime Commission created under Arkansas Code §12-7-101 is abolished.”

Preambles. Acts 1973, No. 430 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the Arkansas State Police currently provide supplemental police protection at the horse and dog racing tracks in this state, at University of Arkansas football games in Little Rock and Fayetteville, and a number of other state-wide events and activities, yet does not provide similar services, when requested, for many other state-wide athletic events of other state supported colleges and universities, at the State Livestock Show, or events conducted at the State Livestock Show, at the state basketball tournaments and similar events; and

“Whereas, it is essential for the protection of the public peace and safety that the State Police provide the same level of police protection for all state-wide functions….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1945, No. 231, § 28: Mar. 20, 1945. Emergency clause provided: “It having been ascertained and determined by the General Assembly that on account of the widespread disregard for the traffic laws of the state and the rules and regulations governing the same as a result of the establishment of many large war plants and military posts in the State of Arkansas, together with the enormous increase of traffic caused by the war, which has created conditions at and around such war plants and military posts creating a condition upon the highways of this state which, in order to efficiently operate the Department of Arkansas State Police, make it necessary that the same be departmentalized and organized in such manner that the personnel of said department can be assigned and directed in a more efficient manner and because of the hazards to life and limb as a result of the disregard for the laws making such conditions dangerous to the health, peace, and safety of the people of Arkansas an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the peace, health, and safety of the citizens of this state and for the traveling public, this act shall take effect and be in full force after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1949, No. 157, § 2: Feb. 23, 1949. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found by the General Assembly: (1) that highway accidents and fatalities have been and are increasing with such rapidity it is imperative that immediate action be taken to make and enforce rules or regulations having for their primary purpose a reduction of such accidents and fatalities; (2) that more effective rules and regulations can be promulgated by an enlarged Commission, the members of which are residents of and familiar with conditions in the various sections of the State; and (3) that only the provisions of this act will alleviate in part the foregoing conditions. An emergency is therefore declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval by the Governor.”

Acts 1953, No. 74, § 3: Feb. 16, 1953. Emergency clause provided: “It is found by the General Assembly that confusion exists in connection with appointments to be made to the Arkansas Police Commission due to congressional redistricting of the state; that such confusion interferes with proper exercise and discharge of the duties of the Police Commission pertaining to traffic violations and criminal actions; and that such conditions adversely affect the public peace, health, and safety; and further that the provisions of this act will materially aid in alleviating such conditions. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1963, No. 133, § 2: July 1, 1963.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 65, § 3: became law without Governor's signature, Feb. 27, 1968. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Section 4 (a) Act 231 of 1945 requires, as interpreted by the Supreme Court of Arkansas, that the Director of the Department of Arkansas State Police possess the qualification of 10 years of continuous residence in the State of Arkansas next preceding his appointment; and such requirement has the effect of excluding from consideration for appointment to such position, persons who because of their training and experience, are well qualified to hold the position of Director of the Department of Arkansas State Police and to carry out the duties and responsibilities imposed by law upon the said Director; and that in order for the Governor of the State of Arkansas to be able to appoint the best qualified person available for the position of Director of Arkansas State Police, it is necessary that the ten year continuous residence requirement of Act 231 of 1945 be repealed; and in order to protect the citizens of the State of Arkansas and their interest in effective and efficient law enforcement, it is necessary that this act become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective, and be in full force and effect, from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 394, § 3: Apr. 11, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law contains no authority for the payment of per diem and mileage to members of the Arkansas Police Commission, that it is essential that provision be made for the payment of a reasonable per diem and mileage to members of the commission in order that the commission may properly carry out its functions and duties, and that this act will provide such authority. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of public peace, health, and safety shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1035, § 3: Jan. 27, 1976. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventieth General Assembly, meeting in Extended Session, that the standardization of mileage reimbursement for members of the State's Boards and Commissions will alleviate many discrepancies and inequities in existing laws and will allow such members to receive travel reimbursement commensurate with that paid to state employees. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 45, § 15: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the agencies, departments, and programs now performed through the Department of Public Safety could more efficiently and economically perform their respective duties and responsibilities through reorganized agencies and departments operating as separate entities; that substantial savings could be made by eliminating the central services of the Department of Public Safety; and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to provide for advance planning for more efficient administration after the close of the current fiscal biennium of the various public safety programs of this state. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1981, No. 540, § 18: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Third General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two-year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1981 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1981 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and providing of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1983, No. 537, § 12: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two-year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1983 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1983 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1987, No. 862, § 3: Apr. 13, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1035 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 1037, § 16: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Sixth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1987 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1987 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 285, § 15: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1989 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1989 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1989, No. 859, § 3: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, that the establishment of a ‘drug abuse hotline’ to be operated by the Arkansas State Police would provide needed assistance in the fight to control the drug problem in the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1991, No. 1099, § 25: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1991 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1991 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 508, § 22: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1993 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1993 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 1240, § 12: Apr. 9, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the powers and duties of the Department of Human Services in regard to the child abuse hotline and child abuse investigations will be shifted to the Arkansas State Police, either through transfer or by contract; that such transfer or contract could occur prior to or at the beginning of the next fiscal year; and that such transfer or contract cannot occur prior to or at the beginning of the next fiscal year unless this emergency clause is adopted. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 750, § 2: Mar. 13, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas State Police is presently without a director; that without an emergency clause this act would not be effective until ninety (90) days after the adjournment sine die of the General Assembly; that a new director should be appointed before this act would take effect without an emergency clause; and that the members of the Arkansas State Police Commission should be consulted prior to that appointment. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1422, § 21: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2001 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2001 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 74: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act includes technical corrects to Act 923 of 2003 which establishes the classification and compensation levels of state employees covered by the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act; that Act 923 of 2003 will become effective on July 1, 2003; and that to avoid confusion this act must also effective on July 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2003, No. 1609, § 24: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2003 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2003 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2005, No. 194, § 2: Feb. 17, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the procedure for accepting military surplus property has changed; that Arkansas law is not currently consistent with the new procedure; that this act is immediately necessary in order to process all military surplus property consistently in accordance with the new procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 82, § 23: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the General Improvement Fund should no longer be utilized; that the Development and Enhancement Fund is necessary to complete unfinished state projects; and that this act is necessary to address infrastructure needs and unanticipated needs of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1945, No. 231, § 25, in part, expressly repealed Acts 1937, No. 166 and Acts 1941, Nos. 371 and 372. The section vested all powers and duties of the Superintendent of the Arkansas State Police in the Director of the Arkansas State Police and vested all duties of the Arkansas State Police Commission and the State Police Department in the Department of Arkansas State Police.

Acts 1981, No. 45, § 2, provided, in part, that the Department of Arkansas State Police and the Arkansas Police Commission, which had previously been transferred by a type 2 transfer to the Department of Public Safety (abolished by Acts 1981, No. 45, § 1) by Acts 1971, No. 38, § 14, and all of their respective functions, powers, duties, personnel, and funds would be separated from the Department of Public Safety; that the department and commission would function, operate, and perform the same powers, functions, and duties; and that the members or heads thereof would be appointed in the same manner, as if they had never been transferred to the Department of Public Safety.

The section further provided that all powers, functions, and duties added to the Police or Police Services Division of the Department of Public Safety, subsequent to the enactment of Acts 1971, No. 38, would be vested in and performed by the Department of Arkansas State Police, and that all powers, functions, and duties of the Arkansas Police Commission with respect to the Department of Arkansas State Police, and all additional powers and duties of the commission added subsequent to the enactment of Acts 1971, No. 38, which had not been repealed, would be performed by the commission in the same manner as they were performed prior to the passage of Acts 1971, No. 38.

In addition, the section provided that nothing in the act should be construed to reduce any rights which an employee of the Department of Arkansas State Police had under any civil service or merit system.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a).

There is created the Division of Arkansas State Police for the purposes of enforcing the motor vehicle laws, traffic laws, and other state laws relating to protecting and properly maintaining the state highway system of the State of Arkansas and to render more effective the apprehension of criminals and the enforcement of criminal law.

The police officers provided for in this chapter shall be known as “Arkansas State Police”.

The Arkansas State Police Commission is created and established.

(1)The commission shall be composed of seven (7) members to be appointed by the Governor for terms of seven (7) years, by and with the advice and consent of the Senate.

However, no more than two (2) members shall be appointed from any congressional district.

(1)When vacancies occur in the commission, the Governor may temporarily fill the position consistent with subsection (b) of this section until the Senate is next in session.

The commission shall meet and organize, electing one (1) member as chair and one (1) member as secretary.

The chair shall have the power to convene the commission at such time as he or she may deem proper after due notice thereof to all the members of the commission.

The commission is directed to hold a minimum of one (1) meeting per month.

Except for those absences due to illness of the commissioner, failure of any commissioner to attend three (3) consecutive meetings shall constitute cause for removal from office by the Governor.

A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum to transact any business properly brought before it and not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

A quorum may do and perform other duties as are prescribed in this chapter or that may be necessary for the proper enforcement of this chapter.

Members of the commission may receive expense reimbursement and stipends in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

No member of the commission shall be eligible to hold or run for any elective office, either state or county, during the time he or she shall serve as a member of the commission.

Any violation of subdivision (j)(1) of this section shall constitute cause for removal by the Governor.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Part of this section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 862, § 1. Acts 1987, No. 834, provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

Publisher's Notes. For detachment of commission from Department of Public Safety, see Publisher's Notes to §12-8-101.

The terms of the members of the Arkansas State Police Commission are arranged so that one (1) term expires January 14 each year.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment deleted (b)(3).

Review each application for employment presented to it by the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police for certification to the eligibility list.

The person shall be punished by the circuit court upon petition being filed with the circuit court by the commission in the same manner as provided by law for punishment of contempt of the circuit court.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “shall” for “is directed to” in (a); inserted the subdivision (1) and (3) designations in (a) and made related changes; deleted “or demotion” at the end of present (a)(1); and inserted (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (e)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a)(3) and (c); and substituted “division” for “department” in (c).

While the commission's actions on review may effectively enhance a punishment ordered by the director, such action is within the bounds of the statutory authority; inherent in the authority to disapprove disciplinary action is the obvious effect of enhancing or diminishing the action taken by the director. Tuck v. Ark. State Police Comm'n, 282 Ark. 39, 665 S.W.2d 276 (1984).

The commission acted within the bounds of its statutory authority in disapproving the director's proposed disciplinary actions against officer and making a recommendation for termination. Tuck v. Ark. State Police Comm'n, 282 Ark. 39, 665 S.W.2d 276 (1984).

Where the evidence was overwhelming that unsuccessful applicant for a position with the Arkansas State Police had a dismal employment history and unfavorable credit history, a prima facie case of race discrimination could not stand absent evidence that the police department's personnel actions were a pretext for racial discrimination. Ward v. Ark. State Police, 539 F. Supp. 1116 (E.D. Ark. 1982), aff'd, 714 F.2d 62 (8th Cir. 1983).

Cited: Lewellen v. Raff, 649 F. Supp. 1229 (E.D. Ark. 1986).

(1)The commission shall perform the duties prescribed in this chapter.

Members of the commission shall not exercise police powers, nor shall the appointment qualify a commissioner as a law enforcement officer as defined in § 12-9-102.

(1)(A)After conferring with the members of the Arkansas State Police Commission, the Governor shall appoint a Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police who shall be the executive and administrative head of the Division of Arkansas State Police and shall receive a salary as fixed by law.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall report to the Secretary of the Department of Public Safety.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall be of good moral character and a resident and a qualified elector of the State of Arkansas.

In addition to all other qualifications contained in this section, the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police, at the time of appointment to the position of Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police, shall either:

Be a college graduate with at least a bachelor's degree in criminology, business administration, or a related field;

Have graduated from a standard high school or vocational school and have eight (8) years' previous experience in law enforcement or a related field with considerable supervisory and administrative experience; or

Have at least ten (10) years' experience in law enforcement.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall determine the number of other officers and patrol personnel to be employed by the Division of Arkansas State Police, and they shall be paid salaries according to rank, not exceeding the salaries provided.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall promulgate such rules as are necessary for the efficient operation of the Division of Arkansas State Police and for the enforcement of such duties as are prescribed in this chapter.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall keep the books and records of the Division of Arkansas State Police, which shall be audited as the books and accounts of other state departments.

An annual report to the secretary and a biannual report to the General Assembly showing the activities, number of arrests, amounts collected by the Division of Arkansas State Police, and disposition of all cases shall be made by the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police.

(1)The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall have supervision and control for the purpose of discipline and proper management of all the members and employees of the Division of Arkansas State Police.

The amount spent for training employees of the Division of Arkansas State Police under the memorandum of understanding between the State of Arkansas and the United States Department of Justice or the United States Department of Homeland Security shall be paid in accordance with the provisions of § 12-8-118.

(A)Upon request of the Director of State Highways and Transportation, the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police may designate certified law enforcement officers from the Arkansas Highway Police Division of the Arkansas Department of Transportation to be trained under the terms of the memorandum of understanding described in subdivision (f)(2) of this section.

The amount spent for training certified law enforcement officers from the Arkansas Highway Police Division of the Arkansas Department of Transportation shall be paid by the Arkansas Department of Transportation.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police may establish such divisions within the ranks of the Division of Arkansas State Police as he or she may deem necessary and proper.

Whenever in the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police's discretion the action is necessary for the efficient operation of the Division of Arkansas State Police, the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police may:

However, any demotion pursuant to subdivision (h)(2)(A) of this section shall be for nondisciplinary reasons.

Due to the exacting and special duties of the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police, he or she may draw an expense allowance in an amount not to exceed six hundred dollars ($600) per month.

(1)Subject to the provisions of subsection (f) of this section, the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police may negotiate the terms of a memorandum of understanding between the State of Arkansas and the United States Department of Justice or the United States Department of Homeland Security concerning the enforcement of federal immigration laws.

Prior to the signing provided for by subdivision (j)(2)(A) of this section, the memorandum of understanding shall be reviewed by the Legislative Council.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall implement or assist other entities to develop and implement a public service campaign concerning racial profiling and may utilize brochures, flyers, or public service announcements.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment by No. 665, in (h), inserted “Whenever in the director's discretion the action is necessary for the efficient operation of the department”, inserted the subdivision (1) and (2)(A) designations and made related changes, and added (2)(B).

The 2005 amendment by No. 907 substituted “Director of the Department of Arkansas State Police” for “director” and “Department of Arkansas State Police” for “department” throughout; substituted “years'” for “years of” in (a)(3)(B) and (C); inserted the subdivision (1) designation in (f); inserted (f)(2) and (f)(3); substituted “he or she” for “director” in (g); rewrote (h); substituted “he or she may” for “the director is authorized to” in (i); and added (j).

The 2005 amendment by No. 2136 added (k).

The 2007 amendment substituted “shall implement or assist other entities to develop and implement” for “may implement” in (k).

The 2011 amendment substituted “promulgate such rules” for “promote such rules and regulations” in (c).

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” once in (f)(3)(A) and twice in (f)(3)(B); and substituted “paid” for “borne” in (f)(3)(B).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” throughout the section; inserted (a)(1)(C); substituted “secretary” for “Governor” in (e); and substituted “Director of the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “Director of the Law Enforcement Standards andTraining” in (j)(2)(A).

Appointee who lived out of state seven years before his appointment was not qualified for appointment as Director of the Department of Arkansas State Police, even though he owned real estate in Arkansas during all seven years and intended to return. Hogan v. Davis, 243 Ark. 763, 422 S.W.2d 412 (1967) (decision prior to 1968 amendment).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a) and (b); substituted “division” for “department” in (b) and (d); and made a stylistic change.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 150, § 1, repealed §14-42-401 et seq.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment inserted “patrolling” preceding “certain” in the section heading; added the subsection designated (h)(1)(A); substituted “controlled-access facilities” for “limited access highways” in (h)(1)(A); added (h)(1)(B) and (h)(1)(C); substituted “controlled-access facilities” for “limited access highways” in (h)(2); and substituted “controlled-access facility” for “limited access highway” in (h)(3).

The 2011 amendment substituted “The following law enforcement officers” for “Municipal police” in the introductory paragraph of (h)(1)(A); inserted (h)(1)(A)(i) through (iv); deleted “for municipal police” following “authorization” in (h)(1)(B) and (h)(1)(C)(i); substituted “law enforcement officers” for “municipal police” in (h)(1)(C)(ii)(b) ; substituted “law enforcement agency” for “municipal police force” in (h)(1)(C)(ii)(c) ; substituted “The following law enforcement officers” for “Municipal police” in the introductory paragraph of (h)(2); inserted (h)(2)(A) through (D); and inserted “an officer established under §14-42-401 et seq., a city marshal, or a constable” in (h)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(2); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, throughout the section, substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police”, and substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “department”.

Cross References. Accident report forms for traffic accidents prepared by department, §27-53-206.

Arkansas State Criminal Records Act, intent of, §12-12-1502.

Authority of Medicaid Fraud Protection Unit, §12-8-507.

Dissemination of criminal history information, §12-12-1504.

Drivers' examinations conducted by, §27-16-705.

Highways, roads, and streets, §27-64-101 et seq.

Implementation of Arkansas State Criminal Records Act, §12-12-1512.

Municipal police departments, §14-52-101 et seq.

Reports of motor vehicle accidents made to, §27-53-201 et seq.

Given that the statutory grant of authority to the state police in subsection (b) is equivalent to that possessed by municipal police officers and county sheriffs, a request for assistance by an Arkansas State Police Trooper is sufficient to give rise to extraterritorial arrest authority to a local law enforcement officer. White v. State, 41 Ark. App. 170, 850 S.W.2d 34 (1993).

City police officer lacked the authority under Arkansas law to make traffic stops and arrests on the Interstate. Nevertheless, because he had probable cause to arrest for the offense of reckless driving committed in his presence, no Fourth Amendment violation occurred, with the result that the arrestee's 42 U.S.C. § 1983 cause of action failed as a matter of law.Rose v. City of Mulberry, 533 F.3d 678 (8th Cir. 2008).

Evidence obtained in a stop of defendant's vehicle for speeding on the interstate should have been suppressed because a municipal police department did not have the authority to make a selective-traffic enforcement type of traffic stop on the interstate; Arkansas State Police Director's letter in force at the time of the stop limited the authority to general patrol purposes only. McKim v. State, 2009 Ark. App. 834 (2009).
